California statutes. Public Resources Code
 of empty plastic beverage containers subject to the California Redemption Value, pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 14560), that the plastic material reclaimer has collected and sold in the previous calendar year. The report shall specify the amount in pounds and by resin type of empty plastic containers sold in the state for beverage processing. The plastic material reclaimer shall submit this information to the department under penalty of perjury pursuant to standardized forms in the form and manner prescribed by the department.

(c) On or before March 1, 2024, and annually thereafter, a manufacturer of postconsumer recycled plastic shall report to the department the amount in pounds of food-grade flake, pellet,
 sheet, fines, or other forms that were sold in the previous calendar year and their capacity to produce food-grade material. The report shall specify the amount in pounds of material that meets beverage manufacturer specifications for bottle-grade material. The report shall include the amount in pounds of food-grade material sold in the state for beverage processing. The manufacturer shall submit this information to the department under penalty of perjury pursuant to standardized forms in the form and manner prescribed by the department.

(d) The department shall post the information reported pursuant to subdivision (a) within 45 days on the department’s internet website.

(e) This section does not apply to a refillable plastic beverage container.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 115, Sec. 3.   (AB 793)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

14549.4.

The department shall study and develop a system or process to address the issue of glass contamination to improve the quality of glass material collected.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 977, Sec. 1.   (SB 38)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

14549.5.

On or before April 1, 2004, and annually thereafter, or more frequently as determined to be necessary by the department, the department shall review and, if necessary in order to ensure payment of the most accurate commingled rate feasible, recalculate commingled rates paid for beverage containers and postfilled containers paid to curbside recycling programs and collection programs. Prior to recalculating a commingled rate pursuant to this section, the department shall do all of the following:

(a) Consult with private and public operators of curbside recycling programs and collection programs concerning the size of the statewide sample, appropriate sampling methodologies, and alternatives to exclusive
 reliance on a statewide commingled rate.

(b) At least 60 days prior to the effective date of any new commingled rate, hold a public hearing, after giving notice, to make available to the public and affected parties the department’s review and any proposed recalculations of the commingled rate.

(c) At least 60 days prior to the effective date of any new commingled rate, and upon the request of any party, make available documentation or studies which were prepared as part of the department’s review of a commingled rate.

(d) (1) Notwithstanding this division, the department may calculate a curbside recycling program commingled rate pursuant to this subdivision for bimetal containers and a combined commingled rate for all plastic beverage containers displaying the resin identification code “3,” “4,”
 “5,” “6,” or “7” pursuant to Section 18015.

(2) The department may enter into a contract for the services required to implement the amendments to this section made by Chapter 753 of the Statutes of 2003. The department may not expend more than two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) for each year of the contract. The contract shall be paid only from revenues derived from redemption payments and processing fees paid on plastic beverage containers displaying the resin identification code “3,” “4,” “5,” “6,” or “7” pursuant to Section 18015. If the department determines that insufficient funds will be available from these revenues, after refund values are paid to processors and the reduction is made in the processing fee pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 14575 for these containers, the department may determine not to calculate a commingled rate pursuant to this subdivision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 356, Sec. 18.   (SB 96)   Effective September 26, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

14549.6.

(a) The department, consistent with Section 14581 and subject to the availability of funds, shall annually pay a total of fifteen million dollars ($15,000,000) per fiscal year to operators of curbside programs and neighborhood dropoff programs that accept all types of empty beverage containers for recycling. The payments shall be for each container collected by the curbside or neighborhood dropoff programs and properly reported to the department by processors, based upon all of the following:

(1) The payment amount shall be calculated based upon the volume of beverage containers collected by curbside and neighborhood dropoff programs during the 12-month calendar year ending on December 31 of the fiscal year for which payments are to be made.

(2) The per-container rate shall be calculated by dividing the total volume of beverage containers collected, as determined pursuant to paragraph (1), into the sum of fifteen million dollars ($15,000,000).

(3) The amount to be paid to each operator of a curbside program or neighborhood dropoff program shall be based upon the per-container rate, calculated pursuant to paragraph (2), multiplied by the program’s total reported beverage container volume calculated pursuant to paragraph (1).

(b) The amounts paid pursuant to this section shall be expended by operators of curbside and neighborhood dropoff programs only for activities related to beverage container recycling.

(c) The department shall disburse payments pursuant to this section not later than the end of the fiscal year following the calendar year for which the payments are calculated pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), subject to the availability of funds.

(d) The operator of a curbside program or neighborhood dropoff program shall make available for inspection and review any relevant record that the department determines is necessary to verify compliance with this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 696, Sec. 7.   Effective September 30, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

14549.7.

(a) In order to develop California markets for glass beverage containers collected for recycling in the state, the department may, subject to the availability of funds, pay a market development payment pursuant to this section to a glass beverage container manufacturer who purchases recycled glass collected within this state for use in manufacturing new beverage containers in this state.

(b) The department shall make a market development payment to a glass beverage container manufacturer in accordance with this section only if the empty glass beverage containers are collected, washed, and processed and are used in manufacturing new glass beverage containers in the state.

(c) The department shall determine the amount of the market development payment, which may be set at different levels, but the payment shall not exceed
 one hundred fifty dollars ($150) per ton. In setting the amount of the market development payment, the department shall consider all of the following:

(1) The minimum funding level needed to encourage in-state washing and processing of empty glass beverage containers collected for recycling in this state.

(2) The minimum funding level needed to encourage in-state manufacturing that utilizes empty glass beverage containers collected for recycling in this state.

(3) The total amount of funds projected to be available for glass market development payments, and the desire to maintain the minimum funding level needed throughout the year.

(d) This
 section shall remain in effect only until January 1,
 2030, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 627, Sec. 2.   (AB 899)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

14549.8.

(a) The department shall determine eligibility for a market development payment described in Section 14549.2 based on current market conditions and shall consider factors including, but not limited to, the information required to be reported pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (b).

(b) (1) In order to be eligible for a market development payment, a reclaimer or manufacturer shall report to the department, in a form and manner determined by the department, all of the following:

(A) The source of the plastic.

(B) The quantity and the price of plastic purchased, processed, and sold.

(C) For reclaimers, the quality of the plastic both purchased and sold.

(D) For manufacturers, the types of products that are made from the plastic.

(E) Overall benefit to the beverage container recycling program and advancing circularity in the state.

(2) All information provided to the department in reports specified under paragraph (1) is considered proprietary and confidential in nature. The department shall protect any information obtained pursuant to this section in accordance with Section 14554.

(3) Information regarding the data collected pursuant to this subdivision shall be aggregated and published by the department on its internet website by February 15, 2030.

(c) The reporting specified in subdivision (b) is not a violation of the Cartwright Act (Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 16700) of Part 2 of Division 7 of the Business and Professions Code).

(d) The department shall publish a report on its website regarding proposed methodologies for the verification of recycled plastic no later than January 1, 2032. In developing the report, the department shall consider relevant information on standards for verifying and tracking recycled content programs and approaches in other states, localities, unions, and nations.

(e) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2033, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 62, Sec. 6.   (SB 166)   Effective July 6, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2033, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

14549.9.

(a) A beverage manufacturer may agree with one or more beverage manufacturers to submit a consolidated report, in lieu of individual reports, with aggregated information required by Section 14547 and subdivision (a) of Section 14549.3 that covers one or more beverage manufacturers if those beverage manufacturers share rights to the same brands or the products of which are distributed, marketed, or manufactured by a single reporting beverage manufacturer.
 A consolidated report shall be submitted to the department under penalty of perjury pursuant to standardized forms in the form and manner prescribed by the department. Beverage manufacturers included in the consolidated report shall be jointly and severally responsible for compliance with Section 14547 and subdivision (a) of Section 14549.3 and for penalties imposed in connection with the report, including, but not limited to, the annual administrative penalty specified in subdivision (b) of Section 14547.

(b) The department may adopt regulations as necessary to implement subdivision (a). Until January 1, 2025, the adoption and readoption of
 regulations to implement subdivision (a) shall be deemed to be an emergency and necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, or general welfare for purposes of Sections 11346.1 and 11349.6 of the Government Code, and the department is hereby exempted from the requirement that it describe facts showing the need for immediate action and from review of the emergency regulations by the Office of Administrative Law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 983, Sec. 1.   (SB 551)   Effective September 29, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4. Reporting [14550. - 14556.]

14550.

(a) (1) Every processor shall report to the department for each month the amount of empty beverage containers, by material type and weight of container or material, excluding refillable beverage containers, received from recycling centers and curbside programs for recycling, and the scrap value paid for glass, PET, and bimetal containers and any beverage container that is assessed a processing fee. Every processor shall also report to the department for each month the amount of other postfilled aluminum, glass, and plastic food and drink packaging materials sold filled to consumers in this state and returned for recycling. These reports shall be submitted within 10 days after each month, in
 the form and manner that the department may prescribe, which may include electronic submittal.

(2) The department shall treat all information reported pursuant to this section by a processor as commercial or financial information subject to the procedures established pursuant to Section 14554.

(b) Every distributor who sells or offers for sale in this state beverages in aluminum beverage containers, nonaluminum metal beverage containers, glass beverage containers, plastic beverage containers, or other beverage containers, including refillable beverage containers of these types, shall report to the department for each month the number of beverages sold in these beverage containers in this state that are labeled pursuant to Section 14561, by material type and size and weight of
 container or any other
 method as the department may prescribe. These reports shall be submitted by the day when payment is due, consistent with the applicable payment schedule specified in subdivision (a) of Section 14574, in the form and manner that the department may prescribe, which may include electronic submittal.

(c) Every distributor who sells or offers for sale in this state beverages in refillable beverage containers and who pays a refund value to distributors, dealers, or consumers who return these containers for refilling, shall report to the department for each month the number of these beverage containers returned empty to be refilled, by material type and size of container or any other method that the department may prescribe. These reports shall be submitted by the day when payment is due, consistent with the schedule specified in
 subdivision (a) of Section 14574, in the form and manner that the department may prescribe, which may include electronic submittal.

(d) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), a distributor who elects to make an annual payment pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 14574 may, upon department approval, submit the reports required by this section annually to the department. The reports shall accompany the annual payment submitted pursuant to Section 14574.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 610, Sec. 17.   (SB 1013)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

14551.

(a) The department shall establish reporting periods for the reporting of redemption rates and recycling rates. Each reporting period shall be six months. The department shall determine all of the following for each reporting period and shall issue a report on its determinations, within 130 days of the end of each reporting period:

(1) Sales of beverages in aluminum beverage containers, bimetal beverage containers, glass beverage containers, plastic beverage containers, and other beverage containers in this state, including refillable beverage containers.

(2) Returns for recycling, and returns not for recycling, of empty aluminum beverage containers, bimetal beverage containers, glass beverage containers, plastic beverage containers, and other beverage containers in this state, including refillable beverage containers returned to distributors pursuant to Section 14572.5. These numbers shall be calculated using the average current weights of beverage containers, as determined and reported by the department. To these numbers shall be added and separately reported the following, if greater than, or equal to, zero:

(A) All empty postfilled aluminum, glass, and plastic food or drink packaging materials sold in the state, returned for recycling, and reported by weight to the department which do not have a refund value less the number specified in subparagraph (B).

(B) The number of beverage containers which comprise the first five percentage points of the redemption rate without including the empty postfilled aluminum, glass, and plastic food or drink packaging materials sold in the state, returned for recycling and reported by weight to the department which do not have a refund value.

(3) An aluminum beverage container redemption rate, the numerator of which shall be the number of empty aluminum beverage containers returned, including refillable aluminum beverage containers and empty postfilled aluminum food or drink packaging material included in paragraph (2), and the denominator of which shall be the number of aluminum beverage containers sold in this state.

(4) An aluminum beverage container recycling rate, the numerator of which shall be the number of empty aluminum beverage containers returned for recycling, including refillable aluminum beverage containers, and the denominator of which shall be the number of aluminum beverage containers sold in this state.

(5) A bimetal beverage container redemption rate, the numerator of which shall be the number of empty bimetal beverage containers returned, and the denominator of which shall be the number of bimetal beverage containers sold in this state.

(6) A bimetal beverage container recycling rate, the numerator of which shall be the number of empty bimetal containers returned for recycling, including refillable bimetal beverage containers, and the denominator of which shall be the number of bimetal beverage containers sold in this state.

(7) A glass beverage container redemption rate, the numerator of which shall be the number of empty glass beverage containers returned, including refillable glass beverage containers and empty postfilled food or drink packaging materials included in paragraph (2), and the denominator of which shall be the number of glass beverage containers sold in this state.

(8) A glass beverage container recycling rate, the numerator of which shall be the number of empty glass beverage containers returned for recycling, including refillable glass beverage containers, and the denominator of which shall be the number of glass beverage containers sold in this state.

(9) A plastic beverage container redemption rate, the numerator of which shall be the number of empty plastic beverage containers returned, including refillable plastic beverage containers and empty postfilled food or drink packaging materials included in paragraph (2), and the denominator of which shall be the number of plastic beverage containers sold in this state.

(10) A plastic beverage container recycling rate, the numerator of which shall be the number of empty plastic beverage containers returned for recycling, including refillable plastic beverage containers, and the denominator of which shall be the number of plastic beverage containers sold in this state.

(11) A redemption rate for other beverage containers, the numerator of which shall be the number of empty beverage containers other than those containers specified in paragraphs (1) to (10), inclusive, returned, and the denominator of which shall be the number of beverage containers, other than those containers specified in paragraphs (1) to (10), inclusive, sold in this state.

(12) A recycling rate for other beverage containers, the numerator of which shall be the number of empty beverage containers other than those containers specified in paragraphs (1) to (10), inclusive, returned for recycling, and the denominator of which shall be the number of beverage containers, other than those containers specified in paragraphs (1) to (10), inclusive, sold in this state.

(13) The department may define categories of other beverage containers, and report a redemption rate and a recycling rate for each such category of other beverage containers.

(14) The volumes of materials collected from certified recycling centers, by city or county, as requested by the city or county, if the reporting is consistent with the procedures established pursuant to Section 14554 to protect proprietary information.

(b) The department shall determine the manner of collecting the information for the reports specified in subdivision (a), including establishing procedures, to protect any proprietary information concerning the sales and purchases.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 22, Sec. 160.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

14551.4.

The department shall make available the information collected pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 14551, concerning the volumes of materials collected from certified recycling centers, only to a governmental agency that requests the information, including a city or county, or an entity specifically designated by the city or county to receive the information if the entity requests the information, if all of the following conditions are met:

(a) The request is made in writing.

(b) All information provided by the department is provided using the aggregate amounts collected in the city or county unless the city
 or county, or an entity specifically designated by the city or county to receive the information, requests the information provided by each individual certified recycling center.

(c) All information provided to the governmental agency, including a city or county, or an entity specifically designated by the city or county to receive the information, is considered proprietary and confidential in nature and protected in accordance with the requirements of subdivision (b) of Section 14551 of the Public Resources Code, Section 14554 of the Public Resources Code, and paragraph (5) of subdivision (c) of Section 7921.505 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 376.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Sec. 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------

14551.5.

(a) The department shall register the operators of curbside programs pursuant to this section.

(b) Each curbside program that receives refund values and administrative fees from certified processors, or that receives refund values from certified recycling centers, shall register with the department for an identification number. No curbside program may receive refund values or administrative fees without a valid identification number.

(c) The director shall adopt, by regulation, a procedure for the registration of curbside programs. This procedure shall include standards and requirements for registration. These regulations shall require that all information be submitted to the department under penalty of perjury. A curbside program shall meet all of the standards and requirements contained in the regulations for registration.

(d) The department shall require that the identification numbers received pursuant to this section be used on shipping reports for material collected by curbside programs pursuant to Sections 14538 and 14539 and on all other reports or documentation required by the department to administer this division.

(e) An operator of a curbside program registered pursuant to this section shall be deemed a certificate holder for purposes of this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 731, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

14552.

(a) The department shall establish and implement an auditing system to ensure that the information collected, and refund values and redemption payments paid pursuant to this division, comply with the purposes of this division. Notwithstanding Sections 14573 and 14573.5, the auditing system adopted by the department may include prepayment or postpayment controls.

(b) (1) The department may audit or investigate any action taken up to five years before the onset of the audit or investigation and may determine if there was compliance with this division and the regulations adopted pursuant to this division, during that period.

(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of law establishing a shorter statute of limitation, the department may take an enforcement action, including, but not limited to, an action for restitution or to impose penalties, at any time within five years after the department discovers, or with reasonable diligence, should have discovered, a violation of this division or the regulations adopted pursuant to this division.

(c) During the conduct of any inspection, including, but not limited to, an inspection conducted as part of an audit or investigation, the entity that is the subject of the inspection shall, during its normal business hours, provide the department with immediate access to its facilities, operations, and any relevant record, that, in the department’s judgment, the department determines are necessary to carry out this section to verify compliance with this division and the
 regulations adopted pursuant to this division.

(1) The department may take disciplinary action pursuant to Section 14591.2 against any person who fails to provide the department with access pursuant to this subdivision including, but not limited to, imposing penalties and the immediate suspension or termination of any certificate or registration held by the operator.

(2) The department shall protect any information obtained pursuant to this section in accordance with Section 14554, except that this section does not prohibit the department from releasing any information that the department determines to be necessary in the course of an enforcement action.

(d) The auditing system adopted by the department shall allow for reasonable shrinkage in material due to moisture, dirt, and foreign material. The department, after
 an audit by a qualified auditing firm and a hearing, shall adopt a standard to be used to account for shrinkage and shall incorporate this standard in the audit process.

(e) If the department prevails against an entity in a civil or administrative action brought pursuant to this division, and money is owed to the department as a result of the action, the department may offset the amount against amounts claimed by the entity to be due to it from the department. The department may take this offset by withholding payments from the entity or by authorizing all processors to withhold payment to a certified recycling center.

(f) If the department determines, pursuant to an audit or investigation, that a distributor or beverage manufacturer has overpaid the redemption payment or processing fee, the department may do either of the following:

(1) Offset the overpayment against future payments.

(2) Refund the payment pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 13140) of Chapter 2 of Part 3 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 35, Sec. 142.   (SB 861)   Effective June 20, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

14552.5.

(a) The department shall supply all certified processors with a standardized rejection form that shall include, but not be limited to, the names of the parties rejecting the postfilled beverage container material, the date of the rejections, the reasons for the rejections, the amount of rejected material, and a detailed accounting of the steps taken by the processor and container manufacturer to avert landfilling or disposal of the material, as required by subdivision (c) of Section 14552.51.

(b) Every container manufacturer shall fill out the standardized rejection form specified in subdivision (a) whenever that container manufacturer rejects a load of redeemed beverage container materials physically delivered to the manufacturer’s place of business and offered for sale by a certified processor. The rejection form shall be filled out by the container manufacturer at the time of the rejection and immediately given to the certified processor for submittal to the department. Any container manufacturer who refuses to fill out the standardized rejection form required by this subdivision is in violation of this division and is subject to the fines and penalties in Sections 14591 and 14591.1.

(c) If a processor has made a good faith effort, as determined by the department, to locate a willing purchaser and is unsuccessful, the processor may fill out the standardized rejection form specified in subdivision (a) and submit it to the department. The processor rejection form shall include, but is not limited to, the name of the processor, the container manufacturers and other potential purchasers contacted, a detailed accounting of the methods used to contact the potential buyers, the date of the rejections, the reasons given for the rejections, the amount of postfilled beverage container material rejected, and any other steps taken to avert landfilling or disposal of the material.

(d) If a container manufacturer rejects a load of postfilled containers by telephone, written correspondence of any kind, or other similar method, the container manufacturer shall, in a manner prescribed by the department, keep accurate logbooks of the offer of loads by the certified processor, and make that logbook available for inspection by the department upon demand. The logbook shall contain, but is not limited to, the same information required in the rejection form pursuant to subdivision (a).

(e) The standardized rejection form specified in subdivision (a) shall be submitted to the department by the certified processor with the written request to dispose of the redeemed material submitted pursuant to Section 14552.51. This material shall not be disposed of without a written authorization to do so by the department pursuant to Section 14552.51.

(f) Nothing in this section shall be interpreted to lessen certified processors’ and container manufacturers’ responsibilities relating to beverage container recycling, or diminish in any way the department’s authority to carry out the intent and goals of this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 183, Sec. 291.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

14552.51.

(a) A certified processor seeking to dispose of rejected postfilled containers may not dispose of rejected postfilled containers unless the certified processor first submits to the department, in writing, a request to dispose of the rejected material. No certified processor shall dispose of the rejected material prior to obtaining written permission from the department. If the department fails to respond to a written request to dispose of rejected postfilled beverage container materials within 10 days of receipt of the request, the processor’s request for disposal is deemed approved by the department.

(b) All rejected loads of postfilled containers shall be available and subject to inspection by the department.

(c) All possible steps to avert the disposal of the loads of postfilled containers, as determined by the department, shall be taken by all container manufacturers and processors. All transactions or attempted transactions involving rejecting postfilled containers shall be thoroughly documented on the standardized rejection form pursuant to Section 14552.5. The container manufacturer and the certified processor are jointly and severally responsible for this effort.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 753, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

14553.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), all reports, claims, and other information required pursuant to this division and submitted to the department shall be complete, legible, and accurate, as determined by the department by regulation, and shall be signed, by an officer, director, managing employee, or owner of the certified recycling center, processor, distributor, beverage manufacturer, container manufacturer, or other entity.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), a person submitting the reports, claims, and other information specified in subdivision (a) shall use the Division of Recycling Integrated Information System (DORIIS) or other system designated by the department for
 reporting, making, or claiming payments, or providing other information required pursuant to this division.

(c) The department may inspect the operations, processes, and records of an entity required to submit a report to the department pursuant to this division to determine the accuracy of the report and compliance with the requirements of this division.

(d) (1) A violation of this section is subject to the penalties specified in Section 14591.1.

(2) The department may take an enforcement action against a certified recycling center or processor that fails to comply with this section, including, but not limited to, imposing penalties, denying claims for payment, or terminating the certification of the certified recycling center or processor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 356, Sec. 19.   (SB 96)   Effective September 26, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

14554.

The department shall establish procedures to protect any privileged, confidential, commercial, or financial information obtained while collecting information for carrying out the requirements of this division. Any privileged, confidential, commercial, or financial information obtained in confidence by the department is not a public record for purposes of Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 377.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Sec. 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------

14555.

(a) On or before July 1, 2025, the department shall provide to the Legislature, and post on its internet website, a report as it relates to appropriations made pursuant to the Budget Act of 2022 for purposes of the California Beverage Container Recycling and Litter Reduction Act, including, but not limited to all of the following information:

(1) Whether and how recycling opportunities and rates in underserved areas improved.

(2) A list of funding recipients.

(3) Locations, including counties, in which funding was provided.

(b) The report shall be
 submitted pursuant to Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 574, Sec. 23.   (AB 211)   Effective September 27, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

14556.

(a) Not less than once every six months, the department shall post on its internet website, at a minimum, all of the following information for the current fiscal year and the budget year:

(1) An updated fund condition statement that includes the revenues, transfers, and expenditures into and out of the fund.

(2) The recycling rate, by beverage container material type, that is inferred using the revenues.

(3) An explanation of significant changes to the fund condition statement from the prior report and significant changes to the methodology used for forecasting the fund condition statement.

(4) Projected sales, which include all actual data available since the last reporting period, by beverage container material type and size, and actual or projected returns, which include all actual data available since the last reporting period, by beverage container material type, including an explanation in any case where the actual returns are more than 100 percent of actual sales.

(5) Projected handling fee payments, which include all actual data available since the last reporting period, the per beverage container handling fee amount, and the number of beverage containers projected to be eligible for a handling fee payment.

(6) Projected processing payments, which include all actual data available since the last reporting period, by beverage container material type, showing the total processing fee offsets, processing
 fees, and processing payments for each type of beverage container material.

(7) Total grants awarded during the current fiscal year.

(b) The department shall notify the Joint Legislative Budget Committee and the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the Assembly and Senate when it makes a posting on its internet website pursuant to subdivision (a).

(c) The department shall review the information included in the fund condition statement frequently, but not less than once every three months, to determine if adequate funds exist to pay the disbursements required pursuant to this division and to make the determinations required pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 14581.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 868, Sec. 5.   (SB 353)   Effective October 13, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 5. Minimum Redemption Value [14560. - 14562.]

14560.

(a) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (3), a beverage distributor shall pay the department, for deposit into the fund, a redemption payment of four cents ($0.04) for a beverage container sold or offered for sale in the state by the distributor.

(2) A beverage container with a capacity of 24 fluid ounces or more shall be considered as two beverage containers for purposes of redemption payments paid pursuant to paragraph (1).

(3) (A) The amount of the redemption payment and refund value for a beverage container with a capacity of less than 24 fluid ounces sold or offered for sale in the state by a dealer shall equal five cents ($0.05), and
 the amount of redemption payment and refund value for a beverage container with a capacity of 24 fluid ounces or more shall be ten cents ($0.10), if the aggregate recycling rate reported pursuant to Section 14551 for all beverage containers subject to this division is less than 75 percent for the 12-month reporting period from January 1, 2006, to December 31, 2006, or for any calendar year thereafter.

(B) A distributor shall not be required to pay a redemption payment pursuant to this section for a beverage container used solely to pour wine, beer, or distilled spirits sold or offered to consumers for consumption on the premises by a wine, beer, or distilled spirits tasting room licensed pursuant to the Alcoholic Beverage Control Act (Division 9 (commencing with Section 23000) of the Business and Professions Code).

(4) (A) Notwithstanding Section 14511, with
 respect to the payment of redemption payments for beverages manufactured outside the state and sold directly to consumers within the state with a direct shipper permit, the distributor shall be deemed to be the person or entity named on the direct shipper permit issued pursuant to Section 23661.3 of the Business and Professions Code, and shall be responsible for paying to the department the total redemption payment for all sales and transfers made directly to consumers in the state. If the department is unable to collect the redemption payment from the person or entity named on the direct shipper permit, the department shall give written notice by certified mail, return receipt requested, to that person or entity. The notice shall state that the person or entity shall not be permitted to offer that beverage brand for sale within the state. If the person or entity fails to remit the redemption payment within 30 days of issuance of the notice, the department shall notify the Department of Alcoholic Beverage